Oklahoma, session 2026, SB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1242 of Title 22, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Government entity” means any department, agency, or


political subdivision of this state or any individual acting for or


on behalf of the state or a political subdivision;


2. “Reverse-keyword court order” means any court order,


including a search warrant, or subpoena compelling the disclosure of


records or information identifying any person who electronically


searched for a particular word, phrase, or website, or who visited a

Req. No. 1267 Page 1


particular website through a link generated by such a search,


regardless of whether or not the order is limited to a specific


geographic area or time frame;


3. “Reverse-keyword request” means any request, in the absence


of a court order, by any government entity for the voluntary


provision of records or information identifying any person who


electronically searched for a particular word, phrase, or website,


or who visited a particular website through a link generated by such


a search, regardless of whether the request is limited to a specific


geographic area or time frame. Such requests shall include offers


to purchase such records or information;


4. “Reverse-location court order” means any court order,


including a search warrant, or subpoena compelling the disclosure of


records or information pertaining to the location of unspecified


electronic devices or the unnamed users or owners of such devices,


for which the scope extends to an unknown number of electronic


devices present in a given geographic area at a given time, whether


such location is measured via Global Positioning System (GPS)


coordinates, cell tower connectivity, Wi-Fi positioning, or any


other form of location detection; and


5. “Reverse-location request” means any request, in the absence


of a court order, by any government entity for the voluntary


provision of records or information pertaining to the location of


unspecified electronic devices or the unnamed users or owners of

Req. No. 1267 Page 2


such devices, for which the scope extends to an unknown number of


electronic devices present in a given geographic area at a given


time, whether such location is measured via Global Positioning


System (GPS) coordinates, cell tower connectivity, Wi-Fi


positioning, or any other form of location detection. Such requests


shall include offers to purchase such records or information.


B. 1. No government entity shall seek a reverse-location court


order or a reverse-keyword court order from any court.


2. No government entity shall seek, secure, obtain, borrow,


purchase, or review any information or data obtained through a


reverse-location court order or a reverse-keyword court order.


3. No court subject to the laws of this state shall issue a


reverse-location court order or a reverse-keyword court order.


4. No person or entity in this state as a result of any law,


regulation, or agreement adopted by this state or any political


subdivision shall be obligated to comply with a reverse-location


court order or a reverse-keyword court order issued by this state, a


political subdivision of this state, any other state, or a political


subdivision of any other state.


5. No court or political subdivision of this state shall


support, assist, or enforce a reverse-location court order or a


reverse-keyword court order issued by this state, a political


subdivision of this state, any other state, or a political


subdivision of any other state.

Req. No. 1267 Page 3


C. 1. No government entity shall make a reverse-location


request or a reverse-keyword request.


2. No government entity shall seek, secure, obtain, borrow,


purchase, or review any information or data obtained through a


reverse-location request or a reverse-keyword request.


3. No government entity shall seek the assistance of any


political subdivision of the federal government or any other state


in obtaining information or data from a reverse-location court


order, reverse-keyword court order, reverse-location request, or


reverse-keyword request if the government entity would be barred


from directly seeking such information under the provisions of this


section.


D. 1. Except as proof of a violation of this section, no


record or information obtained, accessed, or otherwise secured in


violation of this section, nor evidence derived from such record or


information, shall be admissible in any criminal, civil,


administrative, or other proceeding.


2. For the purposes of this section, a record, information, or


evidence is derived from a reverse-location court order, reverse-


keyword court order, reverse-location request, or reverse-keyword


request when the government entity would not have originally


possessed the information or evidence but for the violative court


order or request, and regardless of any claim that the record,


information, or evidence is attenuated from the unlawful order or

Req. No. 1267 Page 4


request, would inevitably have been discovered, or was subsequently


reobtained through other means.


E. 1. Any person whose name or other identifying information


was obtained by a government entity in violation of this section:


a. shall be notified of the violation, in writing, by the


government entity who committed the violation and of


the legal recourse available to that person pursuant


to subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of this subsection


and paragraph 3 of this subsection, and


b. may institute a civil action against such governmental


entity for any of the following:


(1) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation or


actual damages, whichever is greater,


(2) punitive damages,


(3) injunctive or declaratory relief, and


(4) any other relief the court deems proper.


2. In assessing the amount of punitive damages, the court shall


consider:


a. the number of people whose information was disclosed,


b. whether the violation directly or indirectly targeted


persons engaged in the exercise of activities


protected by the Constitution of the United States or


the Constitution of Oklahoma, and



Req. No. 1267 Page 5


c. the persistence of violations by the particular


government entity.


3. In any action brought under this section, the court may


award court costs and reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing


plaintiff.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1267 TEK 1/19/2025 5:40:15 AM

































Req. No. 1267 Page 6